Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.080

Classified service—Appointment, promotion, transfer, suspension, discharge.

All appointments to and promotions to positions in the classified civil service of the office of county sheriff shall be made solely on merit, efficiency, and fitness, which shall be ascertained by open competitive examination and impartial investigation: PROVIDED, That before June 30, 1981, employees in an existing county personnel system may be transferred to newly created and classified positions within such county's sheriff's office, in order to permanently transfer the functions of these positions, without meeting the open competitive examination requirements of this section if the transfer is approved by the civil service commission created in RCW 41.14.030. No person in the classified civil service shall be reinstated in or transferred, suspended, or discharged from any such place, position, or employment contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1980 c 108 s 1; 1959 c 1 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]